Illinois, session 104th, SB2209.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-2-2 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-2-2)7    Sec. 3-2-2. Powers and duties of the Department. 8    (1) In addition to the powers, duties, and 9responsibilities which are otherwise provided by law, the 10Department shall have the following powers:11        (a) To accept persons committed to it by the courts of 12    this State for care, custody, treatment, and 13    rehabilitation, and to accept federal prisoners and 14    noncitizens over whom the Office of the Federal Detention 15    Trustee is authorized to exercise the federal detention 16    function for limited purposes and periods of time.17        (b) To develop and maintain reception and evaluation 18    units for purposes of analyzing the custody and 19    rehabilitation needs of persons committed to it and to 20    assign such persons to institutions and programs under its 21    control or transfer them to other appropriate agencies. In 22    consultation with the Department of Alcoholism and 23    Substance Abuse (now the Department of Human Services),   SB2209- 2 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    the Department of Corrections shall develop a master plan 2    for the screening and evaluation of persons committed to 3    its custody who have alcohol or drug abuse problems, and 4    for making appropriate treatment available to such 5    persons; the Department shall report to the General 6    Assembly on such plan not later than April 1, 1987. The 7    maintenance and implementation of such plan shall be 8    contingent upon the availability of funds.9        (b-1) To create and implement, on January 1, 2002, a 10    pilot program to establish the effectiveness of 11    pupillometer technology (the measurement of the pupil's 12    reaction to light) as an alternative to a urine test for 13    purposes of screening and evaluating persons committed to 14    its custody who have alcohol or drug problems. The pilot 15    program shall require the pupillometer technology to be 16    used in at least one Department of Corrections facility. 17    The Director may expand the pilot program to include an 18    additional facility or facilities as he or she deems 19    appropriate. A minimum of 4,000 tests shall be included in 20    the pilot program. The Department must report to the 21    General Assembly on the effectiveness of the program by 22    January 1, 2003.23        (b-5) To develop, in consultation with the Illinois 24    State Police, a program for tracking and evaluating each 25    inmate from commitment through release for recording his 26    or her gang affiliations, activities, or ranks.  SB2209- 3 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1        (c) To maintain and administer all State correctional 2    institutions and facilities under its control and to 3    establish new ones as needed. Pursuant to its power to 4    establish new institutions and facilities, the Department 5    may, with the written approval of the Governor, authorize 6    the Department of Central Management Services to enter 7    into an agreement of the type described in subsection (d) 8    of Section 405-300 of the Department of Central Management 9    Services Law. The Department shall designate those 10    institutions which shall constitute the State Penitentiary 11    System. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall maintain 12    and administer all State youth centers pursuant to 13    subsection (d) of Section 3-2.5-20. 14        Pursuant to its power to establish new institutions 15    and facilities, the Department may authorize the 16    Department of Central Management Services to accept bids 17    from counties and municipalities for the construction, 18    remodeling, or conversion of a structure to be leased to 19    the Department of Corrections for the purposes of its 20    serving as a correctional institution or facility. Such 21    construction, remodeling, or conversion may be financed 22    with revenue bonds issued pursuant to the Industrial 23    Building Revenue Bond Act by the municipality or county. 24    The lease specified in a bid shall be for a term of not 25    less than the time needed to retire any revenue bonds used 26    to finance the project, but not to exceed 40 years. The   SB2209- 4 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    lease may grant to the State the option to purchase the 2    structure outright.3        Upon receipt of the bids, the Department may certify 4    one or more of the bids and shall submit any such bids to 5    the General Assembly for approval. Upon approval of a bid 6    by a constitutional majority of both houses of the General 7    Assembly, pursuant to joint resolution, the Department of 8    Central Management Services may enter into an agreement 9    with the county or municipality pursuant to such bid.10        (c-5) To build and maintain regional juvenile 11    detention centers and to charge a per diem to the counties 12    as established by the Department to defray the costs of 13    housing each minor in a center. In this subsection (c-5), 14    "juvenile detention center" means a facility to house 15    minors during pendency of trial who have been transferred 16    from proceedings under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 to 17    prosecutions under the criminal laws of this State in 18    accordance with Section 5-805 of the Juvenile Court Act of 19    1987, whether the transfer was by operation of law or 20    permissive under that Section. The Department shall 21    designate the counties to be served by each regional 22    juvenile detention center.23        (d) To develop and maintain programs of control, 24    rehabilitation, and employment of committed persons within 25    its institutions.26        (d-5) To provide a pre-release job preparation program   SB2209- 5 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    for inmates at Illinois adult correctional centers. 2        (d-10) To provide educational and visitation 3    opportunities to committed persons within its institutions 4    through temporary access to content-controlled tablets 5    that may be provided as a privilege to committed persons 6    to induce or reward compliance. 7        (e) To establish a system of supervision and guidance 8    of committed persons in the community.9        (f) To establish in cooperation with the Department of 10    Transportation to supply a sufficient number of prisoners 11    for use by the Department of Transportation to clean up 12    the trash and garbage along State, county, township, or 13    municipal highways as designated by the Department of 14    Transportation. The Department of Corrections, at the 15    request of the Department of Transportation, shall furnish 16    such prisoners at least annually for a period to be agreed 17    upon between the Director of Corrections and the Secretary 18    of Transportation. The prisoners used on this program 19    shall be selected by the Director of Corrections on 20    whatever basis he deems proper in consideration of their 21    term, behavior and earned eligibility to participate in 22    such program - where they will be outside of the prison 23    facility but still in the custody of the Department of 24    Corrections. Prisoners convicted of first degree murder, 25    or a Class X felony, or armed violence, or aggravated 26    kidnapping, or criminal sexual assault, aggravated   SB2209- 6 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    criminal sexual abuse or a subsequent conviction for 2    criminal sexual abuse, or forcible detention, or arson, or 3    a prisoner adjudged a Habitual Criminal shall not be 4    eligible for selection to participate in such program. The 5    prisoners shall remain as prisoners in the custody of the 6    Department of Corrections and such Department shall 7    furnish whatever security is necessary. The Department of 8    Transportation shall furnish trucks and equipment for the 9    highway cleanup program and personnel to supervise and 10    direct the program. Neither the Department of Corrections 11    nor the Department of Transportation shall replace any 12    regular employee with a prisoner.13        (g) To maintain records of persons committed to it and 14    to establish programs of research, statistics, and 15    planning.16        (h) To investigate the grievances of any person 17    committed to the Department and to inquire into any 18    alleged misconduct by employees or committed persons; and 19    for these purposes it may issue subpoenas and compel the 20    attendance of witnesses and the production of writings and 21    papers, and may examine under oath any witnesses who may 22    appear before it; to also investigate alleged violations 23    of a parolee's or releasee's conditions of parole or 24    release; and for this purpose it may issue subpoenas and 25    compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of 26    documents only if there is reason to believe that such   SB2209- 7 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    procedures would provide evidence that such violations 2    have occurred.3        If any person fails to obey a subpoena issued under 4    this subsection, the Director may apply to any circuit 5    court to secure compliance with the subpoena. The failure 6    to comply with the order of the court issued in response 7    thereto shall be punishable as contempt of court.8        (i) To appoint and remove the chief administrative 9    officers, and administer programs of training and 10    development of personnel of the Department. Personnel 11    assigned by the Department to be responsible for the 12    custody and control of committed persons or to investigate 13    the alleged misconduct of committed persons or employees 14    or alleged violations of a parolee's or releasee's 15    conditions of parole shall be conservators of the peace 16    for those purposes, and shall have the full power of peace 17    officers outside of the facilities of the Department in 18    the protection, arrest, retaking, and reconfining of 19    committed persons or where the exercise of such power is 20    necessary to the investigation of such misconduct or 21    violations. This subsection shall not apply to persons 22    committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice under the 23    Juvenile Court Act of 1987 on aftercare release.24        (j) To cooperate with other departments and agencies 25    and with local communities for the development of 26    standards and programs for better correctional services in   SB2209- 8 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    this State.2        (k) To administer all moneys and properties of the 3    Department.4        (l) To report annually to the Governor on the 5    committed persons, institutions, and programs of the 6    Department.7        (l-5) (Blank).8        (m) To make all rules and regulations and exercise all 9    powers and duties vested by law in the Department.10        (n) To establish rules and regulations for 11    administering a system of sentence credits, established in 12    accordance with Section 3-6-3, subject to review by the 13    Prisoner Review Board.14        (o) To administer the distribution of funds from the 15    State Treasury to reimburse counties where State penal 16    institutions are located for the payment of assistant 17    state's attorneys' salaries under Section 4-2001 of the 18    Counties Code.19        (p) To exchange information with the Department of 20    Human Services and the Department of Healthcare and Family 21    Services for the purpose of verifying living arrangements 22    and for other purposes directly connected with the 23    administration of this Code and the Illinois Public Aid 24    Code.25        (q) To establish a diversion program.26        The program shall provide a structured environment for   SB2209- 9 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    selected technical parole or mandatory supervised release 2    violators and committed persons who have violated the 3    rules governing their conduct while in work release. This 4    program shall not apply to those persons who have 5    committed a new offense while serving on parole or 6    mandatory supervised release or while committed to work 7    release.8        Elements of the program shall include, but shall not 9    be limited to, the following:10            (1) The staff of a diversion facility shall 11        provide supervision in accordance with required 12        objectives set by the facility.13            (2) Participants shall be required to maintain 14        employment.15            (3) Each participant shall pay for room and board 16        at the facility on a sliding-scale basis according to 17        the participant's income.18            (4) Each participant shall:19                (A) provide restitution to victims in 20            accordance with any court order;21                (B) provide financial support to his 22            dependents; and23                (C) make appropriate payments toward any other 24            court-ordered obligations.25            (5) Each participant shall complete community 26        service in addition to employment.  SB2209- 10 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1            (6) Participants shall take part in such 2        counseling, educational, and other programs as the 3        Department may deem appropriate.4            (7) Participants shall submit to drug and alcohol 5        screening.6            (8) The Department shall promulgate rules 7        governing the administration of the program.8        (r) To enter into intergovernmental cooperation 9    agreements under which persons in the custody of the 10    Department may participate in a county impact 11    incarceration program established under Section 3-6038 or 12    3-15003.5 of the Counties Code.13        (r-5) (Blank).14        (r-10) To systematically and routinely identify with 15    respect to each streetgang active within the correctional 16    system: (1) each active gang; (2) every existing 17    inter-gang affiliation or alliance; and (3) the current 18    leaders in each gang. The Department shall promptly 19    segregate leaders from inmates who belong to their gangs 20    and allied gangs. "Segregate" means no physical contact 21    and, to the extent possible under the conditions and space 22    available at the correctional facility, prohibition of 23    visual and sound communication. For the purposes of this 24    paragraph (r-10), "leaders" means persons who:25            (i) are members of a criminal streetgang;26            (ii) with respect to other individuals within the   SB2209- 11 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1        streetgang, occupy a position of organizer, 2        supervisor, or other position of management or 3        leadership; and4            (iii) are actively and personally engaged in 5        directing, ordering, authorizing, or requesting 6        commission of criminal acts by others, which are 7        punishable as a felony, in furtherance of streetgang 8        related activity both within and outside of the 9        Department of Corrections.10    "Streetgang", "gang", and "streetgang related" have the 11    meanings ascribed to them in Section 10 of the Illinois 12    Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.13        (s) To operate a super-maximum security institution, 14    in order to manage and supervise inmates who are 15    disruptive or dangerous and provide for the safety and 16    security of the staff and the other inmates.17        (t) To monitor any unprivileged conversation or any 18    unprivileged communication, whether in person or by mail, 19    telephone, or other means, between an inmate who, before 20    commitment to the Department, was a member of an organized 21    gang and any other person without the need to show cause or 22    satisfy any other requirement of law before beginning the 23    monitoring, except as constitutionally required. The 24    monitoring may be by video, voice, or other method of 25    recording or by any other means. As used in this 26    subdivision (1)(t), "organized gang" has the meaning   SB2209- 12 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    ascribed to it in Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang 2    Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.3        As used in this subdivision (1)(t), "unprivileged 4    conversation" or "unprivileged communication" means a 5    conversation or communication that is not protected by any 6    privilege recognized by law or by decision, rule, or order 7    of the Illinois Supreme Court.8        (u) To establish a Women's and Children's Pre-release 9    Community Supervision Program for the purpose of providing 10    housing and services to eligible female inmates, as 11    determined by the Department, and their newborn and young 12    children.13        (u-5) To issue an order, whenever a person committed 14    to the Department absconds or absents himself or herself, 15    without authority to do so, from any facility or program 16    to which he or she is assigned. The order shall be 17    certified by the Director, the Supervisor of the 18    Apprehension Unit, or any person duly designated by the 19    Director, with the seal of the Department affixed. The 20    order shall be directed to all sheriffs, coroners, and 21    police officers, or to any particular person named in the 22    order. Any order issued pursuant to this subdivision 23    (1)(u-5) shall be sufficient warrant for the officer or 24    person named in the order to arrest and deliver the 25    committed person to the proper correctional officials and 26    shall be executed the same as criminal process.   SB2209- 13 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1        (u-6) To appoint a point of contact person who shall 2    receive suggestions, complaints, or other requests to the 3    Department from visitors to Department institutions or 4    facilities and from other members of the public.5        (v) To do all other acts necessary to carry out the 6    provisions of this Chapter.7    (2) The Department of Corrections shall by January 1, 81998, consider building and operating a correctional facility 9within 100 miles of a county of over 2,000,000 inhabitants, 10especially a facility designed to house juvenile participants 11in the impact incarceration program.12    (3) When the Department lets bids for contracts for 13medical services to be provided to persons committed to 14Department facilities by a health maintenance organization, 15medical service corporation, or other health care provider, 16the bid may only be let to a health care provider that has 17obtained an irrevocable letter of credit or performance bond 18issued by a company whose bonds have an investment grade or 19higher rating by a bond rating organization.20    (4) When the Department lets bids for contracts for food 21or commissary services to be provided to Department 22facilities, the bid may only be let to a food or commissary 23services provider that has obtained an irrevocable letter of 24credit or performance bond issued by a company whose bonds 25have an investment grade or higher rating by a bond rating 26organization.  SB2209- 14 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    (5) On and after the date 6 months after August 16, 2013 2(the effective date of Public Act 98-488), as provided in the 3Executive Order 1 (2012) Implementation Act, all of the 4powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities related to State 5healthcare purchasing under this Code that were transferred 6from the Department of Corrections to the Department of 7Healthcare and Family Services by Executive Order 3 (2005) are 8transferred back to the Department of Corrections; however, 9powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities related to State 10healthcare purchasing under this Code that were exercised by 11the Department of Corrections before the effective date of 12Executive Order 3 (2005) but that pertain to individuals 13resident in facilities operated by the Department of Juvenile 14Justice are transferred to the Department of Juvenile Justice. 15    (6) The Department of Corrections shall provide lactation 16or nursing mothers rooms for personnel of the Department. The 17rooms shall be provided in each facility of the Department 18that employs nursing mothers. Each individual lactation room 19must: 20        (i) contain doors that lock; 21        (ii) have an "Occupied" sign for each door; 22        (iii) contain electrical outlets for plugging in 23    breast pumps; 24        (iv) have sufficient lighting and ventilation; 25        (v) contain comfortable chairs; 26        (vi) contain a countertop or table for all necessary   SB2209- 15 -LRB104 08962 RLC 19017 b1    supplies for lactation; 2        (vii) contain a wastebasket and chemical cleaners to 3    wash one's hands and to clean the surfaces of the 4    countertop or table; 5        (viii) have a functional sink; 6        (ix) have a minimum of one refrigerator for storage of 7    the breast milk; and 8        (x) receive routine daily maintenance. 9    (7) The Department of Corrections shall restore, within 18 10months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 11104th General Assembly, the site of any warden's homes 12provided for the chief administrative officer or warden of the 13Pontiac Correctional Center that have been deemed by the 14Department of Corrections to be in a state of disrepair that 15renders them unsafe to be used as residences to their original 16condition before the homes were built. The cost of the site 17restoration required under this subsection (7) shall be paid 18by the Department of Central Management Services. 19(Source: P.A. 102-350, eff. 8-13-21; 102-535, eff. 1-1-22; 20102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 215-27-22; 103-834, eff. 1-1-25.)